en: Fresh Red Bananas
fr: Bananes rouges fraîches, Bananes fraîches rouges
nl: Bananen(verse hele rode), Verse hele rode bananen

en: Fresh Bananas from the Canary Islands
fr: Bananes fraîches des Canaries
nl: Verse hele bananen van de Canarische eilanden, Bananen(verse rode van de Canrische eilanden)

en: Chirimuyas, Custard apples, Cherimoyas
es: Chirimoyas
fr: Chérimoles
hr: Čirimuja
la: Annona cherimola
nl: Cherimoyas

en: Coconuts and their products
da: Kokosnødder og kokosnøddeprodukter
sv: Kokosnötter och kokosnötsprodukter

en: Coconuts
bg: Кокосови орехи
de: Kokosnüsse
es: Cocos
fi: kookospähkinät
fr: Noix de coco
hr: Kokosi
it: Noci di cocco
ja: ココナッツ, ココナツ, ヤシの実
lt: Kokosai
nl: Kokosnoten
pt: Coco
sv: Kokosnötter, kokosnöt
zh: 椰子

en: Fresh ripe coconut kernel
fr: Noix de coco mûre fraîche, Amande de noix de coco mûre fraîche

en: Dried coconut kernel
fr: Noix de coco sèche, Amande de noix de coco sèche

en: Fresh immature coconut kernel
fr: Amande fraîche de noix de coco verte

en: Grated coconut
de: Kokusnuss gerieben
es: Coco rallado
fi: raastettu kookos
fr: Noix de coco râpée
hr: Ribani kokos
lt: Tarkuotas kokosas
nl: Geraspte kokos, Kokosrasp

en: Guavas
es: Guayabas
fr: Goyaves
hr: Guave
it: Guaiava, Guava
ja: グァバ, グアバ
lt: Gvajavos
nl: Guavas

en: Guava pulp
fr: Pulpe de goyave
it: Polpa di guaiava

en: Lychees, Litchis
de: Litschis
es: Lichis
fr: Litchis, Letchis
hr: Ličiji
ja: ライチ
la: Litchi chinensis
lt: Ličiai
nl: Litchis

en: Lychee pulp
fr: Pulpe de litchi

en: Carambola, Star Fruit
ar: قلنباق
as: কৰ্দ্দৈ
bg: Карамбола
bn: কামরাঙা
ca: Caramboler
ch: Bilembines
cs: Karambola, Čínská Hvězdice
da: Karambole, Stjernefrugt
de: Karambole, Baumstachelbeere
dv: ކާމަރަނގަ
el: Καραμπόλα
eo: Karambolfrukto
es: Carambolo, Fruta de Estrella
et: Karamboola
fa: میوه ستاره‌سان
fi: Karambola
fr: Carambole
ga: Toradh Réaltúil
gl: Carambola
he: קרמבולה
hi: कमरख
ht: Karanbòl
hu: Csillaggyümölcs, Carambola
hy: Կարամբոլա
is: Stjörnuávöxtur
it: Carambola
ja: スターフルーツ
jv: Belimbing, Carambola, Star Fruit
kn: ಕಮರಾಕ್ಷಿ
ko: 카람볼라
kv: Карамбола
la: Averrhoa Carambola
ln: Pakapáka
lt: Karambola
lv: Karambola
ml: ആരംപുളി
mr: कमरक
ms: Belimbing Besi, ڤوکوق بليمبيڠ بسي‎‎
my: စောင်းလျားပင်
nb: Stjernefrukt
ne: कन्तर
nl: Stervrucht, Carambola, Sterfruit
or: କରମଙ୍ଗା
pl: Karambola
pt: Caramboleiro, Carambola
ro: Carambola
ru: Карамбола
sd: ڪمرنگو
si: කාමරංගා
sk: Karambola, Čínska Hviezdica
sq: Starfruit
sr: Карамбола, Karambola
su: Balimbing
sv: Carambola
ta: விளிம்பிப்பழம்
te: నక్షత్ర ఫలం చెట్టు
th: มะเฟือง
tl: Balimbing
to: Tapanima
tr: Yıldız Meyvesi
ty: Raparapa
uk: Карамбола
vi: Khế
zh: 楊桃

en: Breadfruit
fr: Fruit à pain

en: Mangoes
de: Mangos
es: Mangos
fi: mangot
fr: Mangues
hr: Mango
it: Manghi
ja: マンゴー
lt: Mangai, Mangas
nl: Mangos

en: Fresh mangoes
fr: Mangues fraîches
hr: Svježi mango
lt: Švieži mangai

en: Mango pulp
fr: Pulpe de mangue

en: Mango imported by plane
fr: Mangue importée par avion

en: Mango imported by boat
fr: Mangue importée par bateau